Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.150

Challenges for cause defined.

A challenge for cause is an objection to a juror, and may be either:

(1) General; that the juror is disqualified from serving in any action; or

(2) Particular; that the juror is disqualified from serving in the action on trial.

[ 2003 c 406 s 6; Code 1881 s 209; 1877 p 43 s 213; 1869 p 51 s 213; RRS s 326.]